Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2107
Public hearing; notice.

Any city council, village board, county board, or tribal government proposing to create an enterprise zone or zones shall hold a public hearing on the question. A notice of the hearing shall be given by one publication of the resolution of intention in a newspaper of general circulation in the city, village, county, or tribal government area at least ten days prior to the hearing.

Laws 1992, LB 1240, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 725, § 8.